Maine, session 132, LD2197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-B is enacted to read:
§1730-B. Sale and leaseback transactions with health care entities prohibited
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Health care entity" means a health care provider, a health care facility or a provider
organization. "Health care entity" does not include a nursing facility as defined by
section 328, subsection 18.
B. "Health care facility" means a licensed institution providing health care services or
a health care setting, including, but not limited to, hospitals and other licensed inpatient
facilities; health systems consisting of one or more health care entities that are jointly
owned or managed; ambulatory surgical or treatment centers; residential treatment
centers; diagnostic, laboratory and imaging centers; freestanding emergency facilities;
outpatient clinics; and rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings.
C. "Health care provider" means any person, corporation, partnership, governmental
unit, state institution, medical practice or any other entity qualified or licensed under
state law to perform or provide health care services to persons in the State.
D. “Main campus” means the licensed premises within which the majority of a health
care entity’s inpatient beds are located.
E. “Provider organization" means any corporation, partnership, business trust,
association or organized group of persons that is in the business of health care delivery
or management, whether incorporated or not, that represents one or more health care
providers in contracting with carriers for the payment of health care services. "Provider
organization" includes, but is not limited to, physician organizations, physician-
hospital organizations, independent practice associations, health care provider
networks, accountable care organizations and management services organizations and
any other organization that contracts with carriers for payment for health care services.
F. “Real estate investment trust” has the same meaning as in the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, Section 856, as amended.
2. Sale and leaseback transactions with health care entities prohibited. The
department may not issue or renew a license for a health care entity if the main campus of
the health care entity is leased from a real estate investment trust, except that any hospital
that was leasing its main campus from a real estate investment trust prior to July 1, 2026 is
exempt from the requirements of this subsection. Such a hospital maintains its exempt
status after a transfer to any transferee and subsequent transferees, and the transferee or
subsequent transferee must be issued a license if the transferee otherwise satisfies all other
requirements for licensure.